North Dakota statutes. TITLE 8 Carriage
CHAPTER 8-12 Autonomous Vehicles

Source:

S.L. 2019, hb1418, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

8-12-01.
Definitions.

As used in the chapter:

“Autonomous vehicle” means a vehicle equipped with an automated driving system.

“Client” means a person requesting service from an on-demand autonomous vehicle network. The term includes a passenger, a shipper, as defined by section 41-07-02, a person entitled under the document, as defined by section 41-07-02, or similar individual or commercial enterprise.

“On-demand autonomous vehicle network” means a transportation service network that uses a software application or other digital means to dispatch or otherwise enable the prearrangement of transportation with autonomous vehicles for purposes of transporting persons or goods, including for-hire transportation, transportation for compensation, and public transportation.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 302, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

8-12-02.
General provisions.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person may operate an on-demand autonomous vehicle network. An on-demand autonomous vehicle network may provide transportation of persons or goods, including:

For-hire transportation;

Public transportation; and

Transportation for multiple passengers who agree to share the ride.

An on-demand autonomous vehicle network may connect passengers to autonomous vehicles without human drivers in compliance with subsection 3 of section 39-01-01.2 exclusively, or as part of a digital network that also connects passengers to human drivers who provide transportation services, consistent with applicable law.

Unless otherwise provided in this chapter and notwithstanding any other provision of law, autonomous vehicles and automated driving systems without human drivers are governed by subsection 3 of section 39-01-01.2.

A state agency or political subdivision may not impose requirements, including performance standards specific to the operation of an autonomous vehicle or automated driving systems without human drivers in compliance with subsection 3 of section 39-01-01.2.

A state or local agency or political subdivision may not impose a tax, fee, or other requirement specific to the operation of an autonomous vehicle that is in compliance with subsection 3 of section 39-01-01.2, an automated driving system, or an on-demand vehicle network. This prohibition does not affect vehicle registration and titling fees otherwise required by law.

This chapter may not be construed to modify, limit, or restrict any statutory provision affecting liability, including chapter 26.1-40, 26.1-41, 28-01.3, 32-03.2, or 39-16.1.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 302, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.